Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  Department of Trans-
portation may, without first  complying with any provision of ORS 270.100 to 270.190 or 366.395
(1), offer to the Albina Vision Trust,  Inc., the following surplus real property of the depart-
ment relating to the Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project:
(a) For sale or lease, for any consideration, any or all of  the state’s interest that was
acquired or developed with moneys not from the State Highway Fund; and
(b) For sale or lease, at fair market value as  determined by the Department of Trans-
portation, any or all of the state’s interest that was acquired or developed  with moneys from
the State Highway Fund.
(2) Moneys received under subsection (1)(b) of this  section must be deposited into the
State Highway Fund.
(3) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall take any actions necessary
to assist the Department of Transportation with any sale or  lease of real property under this
section.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2040.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1182 (SB 1182-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1182 (SB 1182-A) Page 2